Hawaii statutes.
[§87A-17] Group life insurance benefits or
group life insurance program. The board may provide benefits under a group
life insurance benefits program or group life insurance program to employees.
[L 2001, c 88, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next